California statutes. Public Resources Code
(3) Lumber, construction timbers, or cants for remanufacture, except Western Red Cedar, that do not meet the grades referred to in paragraph (2) and are sawn on four sides, with wane less than 14 of any face, not exceeding 834 inches in thickness.

(4) Chips, pulp, or pulp products.

(5) Veneer or plywood.

(6) Poles, posts, or piling cut or treated with preservatives for use as such.

(7) Shakes or shingles.

(8) Aspen or other pulpwood bolts, not exceeding 100 inches in length, exported for processing into pulp.

(9) Pulp logs or cull logs processed at domestic pulp mills, domestic chip plants, or other domestic operations for the purpose of conversion of the logs into chips.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 964, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

4651.

The management of state forests and the cutting and sale of timber and other forest products from state forests shall conform to regulations prepared by the director and approved by the board. These regulations shall be in conformity with forest management practices designed to achieve maximum sustained production of high-quality forest products while giving consideration to values relating to recreation, watershed, wildlife, range and forage, fisheries, and aesthetic enjoyment. The sale of timber and other forest products is limited to raw materials only.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1300.)
-------------------------------------------

4652.

(a) The department may collect recreational user fees for overnight camping and reserved group activities in a demonstration state forest. The department shall not charge a fee that
 exceeds the amount necessary to reimburse the department’s costs for maintenance and improvement of campground facilities, associated recreational facilities, natural environment, and access thereto.

(b) All recreational user fees received by the department during each fiscal year shall be deposited into the Forest Resources Improvement Fund and shall be used, upon appropriation by the Legislature, to reimburse the department’s cost of maintaining and improving the campground facilities, associated recreational facilities, natural environment, and access thereto.

(c) Receipts from the sales of forest products and recreational user fees shall be deposited monthly with the State Treasurer in the Forest Resources Improvement Fund. The Controller shall keep a record of accounts of such receipts separately.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 598, Sec. 1.   (AB 2351)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

4653.

State-owned lands classified by the department and approved by the board as not suited to the growing of forest products, or necessary to the management of the forest, shall be sold according to state laws.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1300.)
-------------------------------------------

4654.

There shall be paid to each county in which lands acquired for state forest purposes are situated, out of funds hereafter made available for such purpose, an amount equivalent to taxes levied by the county on similar land similarly situated in the county in the same manner as provided in the Revenue and Taxation Code for secured property tax payments as long as the state continues to own the land. Such payments shall be based only upon the value of the forest lands used for purposes of continuous commercial forest production and not upon value of such forest land used for any other purposes, including any improvements on such lands. Determination of what constitutes similar land similarly situated shall be made by a committee consisting of the county assessor of the county in which the land is located, a representative of the State Board of Equalization and a representative of the department.

The money received by any county pursuant to this section may be expended by it for any proper state purpose not prohibited by the State Constitution.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1300.)
-------------------------------------------

4655.

Tax-deeded lands classified as forest lands, pursuant to Chapter 4.3 (commencing with Section 3534), Part 6, Division 1 of the Revenue and Taxation Code, may be acquired for the state forest purposes through the usual procedure governing the sale of tax-deeded lands.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1144.)
-------------------------------------------

4656.

This chapter does not interfere with the reasonable use of state forests for hunting, fishing, recreation and camping, except as otherwise provided by law.

The use of state forest lands for grazing and mining purposes shall be permitted pursuant to regulations established by the board in accordance with Chapter 3. 5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code. The use and development of water facilities for irrigation and power shall be permitted as provided by law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1981, Ch. 714, Sec. 359.)
-------------------------------------------

4656.1.

The board may establish rules and regulations, in accordance with Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, for the preservation, protection, and use of state forests and for the promotion and protection of public health and safety within state forests.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1981, Ch. 714, Sec. 360.)
-------------------------------------------

4656.2.

The department shall protect the state forests from damage and preserve the peace therein.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1300.)
-------------------------------------------

4656.3.

Any person who violates the rules and regulations pertaining to the state forests established by the board is guilty of a misdemeanor and upon conviction shall be punished by a fine not exceeding one thousand dollars ($1,000).

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1092, Sec. 341.   Effective September 27, 1983.   Operative January 1, 1984, by Sec. 427 of Ch. 1092.)
-------------------------------------------

4657.

Insofar as the provisions of this chapter may be in conflict with any other provision of this division, the provision of this chapter shall control.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1144.)
-------------------------------------------

4658.

The Mountain Home Tract Forest in Tulare County shall be developed and maintained, pursuant to this chapter, as a multiple-use forest, primarily for public hunting, fishing, and recreation. In future acquisitions and exchanges of land, as provided by law, the acreage in state ownership shall not be reduced below 4,000 acres.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1144.)
-------------------------------------------

4659.

(a) For purpose of this section, the following definitions shall apply:

(1) “City” means the City of Fort Bragg.

 (2) “County” means the County of Mendocino.

 (3) “Entity acquiring title” means either the city or the county, whichever exercises the option specified in subdivision (c) to take title to the property.

 (4) “Property” means the certain real property described as the easterly 17 acres, more or less, of that portion of Mendocino County Assessor’s Parcel Number 019-150-05 which is north of State Highway
 20, located in a portion of the Jackson Demonstration State Forest.

(5) “Solid waste transfer station” has the same meaning as transfer station, as defined in Section 40200.

 (b) Notwithstanding any other law, the Director of General Services, subject to the approval of the Department of Forestry and Fire Protection, may grant an option to the city or to the county, for either entity to acquire title to the property for the purpose of developing a solid waste transfer station.

(c) The option agreement shall have a term of five years, from the date of execution, for the city or county to exercise the option and take title to the site.

(d) Following the transfer of title, the entity acquiring title shall complete the development of, and open, a solid
 waste transfer station no later than 10 years from the date of recordation of the transfer document or the title to the property shall revert back to the Department of Forestry and Fire Protection and the entity shall reimburse the state for the administrative costs incurred by the state to process the reversionary documents.

(e) If the entity acquiring title to the property is successful in opening a solid waste transfer station on the site, all delivery and acceptance of solid waste shall cease at the existing Caspar Landfill property, also known as Mendocino County Assessor’s Parcel Numbers 118-500-10 and 118-500-11.

(f) The Department of Forestry and Fire Protection, on behalf of the state, may be compensated for loss of up to 17 acres of the Jackson Demonstration State Forest by transfer from the Department of Parks and Recreation, on behalf of the state, of 12.6 acres in
 Russian Gulch State Park, which is separated from the remainder of the state park by a county road.

(g) The Department of Parks and Recreation, on behalf of the state, may be compensated, in turn, for loss of the 12.6 acres in Russian Gulch State Park specified in subdivision (f) by the grant of a restrictive covenant on 60 acres of city and county property on the northern boundary of the state park, which is currently a closed landfill and small volume transfer station, and by an option to buy 35 acres of the city and county property.

(h) If the city or county exercises the option to take title to the property pursuant to this section, the Department of Parks and Recreation, with the approval of the Director of General Services, may transfer to the Department of Forestry and Fire Protection jurisdiction over that portion of Russian Gulch State Park northeast of Mendocino County
 Road 409, being 12.6 acres, more or less, and being a portion of Mendocino County Assessor’s Parcel Number 118-520-02, to be included as a part of the Jackson Demonstration State Forest under the direction of the Department of Forestry and Fire Protection.

 (i) If the option to acquire the property is exercised, the entity acquiring title to the property shall execute and record in favor of the Department of Parks and Recreation both of the following:

(1) A covenant restricting the uses and activities at the Caspar Landfill property to prevent any significant nuisance impacts on Russian Gulch State Park. The form of this restrictive covenant shall be approved, prior to recordation, by the Department of Parks and Recreation.

 (2) An option with a term of 99 years and a price of one dollar ($1) to purchase the
 westernmost 35 acres of the Caspar Landfill property, described in subdivision (e), with road access to that property.

(j) The entity acquiring title to the property shall reimburse the state for the difference in the appraised value of the assets that are to be exchanged, if the state is found to be receiving less value, and for reasonable administrative costs incurred to complete the transfer of title.

 (k) The entity acquiring title of the property shall be solely responsible for compliance with the California Environmental Quality Act (Division 13 (commencing with Section 21000) in connection with the transfer of property ownership and development of the solid waste transfer station.

 (l) The exchange of lands carried out pursuant to this section shall be based on current fair market value and subject to the
 terms and conditions, and with the reservations, restrictions, and exceptions that the Director of General Services determines are in the best interests of the state, including the condition that the exchange shall result in no net cost or loss to the state.

(m) (1) If the state exercises the option to purchase the westernmost 35 acres of the Caspar Landfill property, pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (i), the city or county shall indemnify the state against any liability that arises from any injury caused by, or any remediation required by, any contamination on the Caspar Landfill property that is transferred to the state.

(2) The Department of Parks and Recreation shall authorize access to the property described in paragraph (1) to the county in order for the county to perform monitoring, including monitoring of groundwater to ensure that there is no
 leakage or contamination from the landfill.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 173, Sec. 2.   (AB 384)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Soquel Demonstration State Forest [4660. - 4664.]

4660.

It is hereby declared to be the policy of the state to establish and preserve an intensively managed, multifaceted research forest which is representative of forest activities as a living forest in Santa Cruz County within northern California’s coastal redwood belt. The coast redwoods, as the dominant tree species in this area, are a valuable natural resource and are unique in North America for their beauty, abundance, diversity, and public accessibility, and their extreme beauty and economic value requires special measures for their protection for the use, enjoyment, and education of the public.

It is the intent of the Legislature, in establishing the Soquel Demonstration State Forest, to provide an environment that will do all of the following:

(a) Provide watershed protection for local communities and base-line monitoring and studies of the hazards, risks, and benefits of forest operations and watersheds to urban areas.

(b) Provide public education and examples illustrating compatible rural land uses, including sustained yield timber production, as well as the historic development of timbering and forestry machinery, within the context of local community protection and nearby pressures.

(c) Provide a resource for the public, environmental groups, elected officials, environmental planners, the educational community, and the media as an open environment for the inspection and study of environmental education, forestry practices, and effects thereof.

(d) Protect old growth redwood trees.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1338, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

4661.

The department may permit a limited amount of commercial timber operations on the property within the Soquel Demonstration State Forest in order to provide funds for the maintenance and operation of the state forest and to allow fulfillment of the objectives of Section 4660. Income from the state forest property shall sustain all costs of operation and provide income for research and educational purposes.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1338, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

4662.

The department is responsible for the establishment and development of the Soquel Demonstration State Forest and for ongoing maintenance and operations. The director shall appoint an advisory committee to assist the department in planning future management of the forest. The advisory committee shall include representatives of the Santa Cruz County Board of Supervisors, the Department of Parks and Recreation, the State Board of Forestry and Fire Protection, the Forest of Nisene Marks Advisory Committee, and the Department of Fish and Game.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 972, Sec. 20.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

4663.

The department, in coordination with the advisory committee, shall adopt a general plan for the state forest which reflects the long-range development and management plans to provide for the optimum use and enjoyment of the living forest, as provided in Section 4660, as well as the protection of its quality and the watershed within the Santa Cruz area. The advisory committee shall approve the general plan prior to adoption by the department.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 153, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

4664.

The duties and authority of the department pursuant to this article shall only arise if the state acquires the property comprising the Soquel Demonstration State Forest.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1338, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 10. Protection of Forest and Lands [4671. - 4771.6.]



  ARTICLE 1. Cooperative Agreements [4671. - 4676.]

4671.

The department may, in accordance with the policy of the board, engage in and demonstrate methods of developing, using, and protecting the forest and wild land resources of the state. To accomplish such purpose, it may, with the approval of the Department of Finance, enter into agreements with any agency of government, including the federal government, and with any person, firm, or corporation and may make expenditures for such purpose.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1300.)
-------------------------------------------

4672.

The department may, in accordance with the policy of the board, engage in surveys of soil, vegetation, and forest products on the forest, range, and watershed lands of the state. The department may, with the approval of the Department of Finance, enter into agreements with any agency of government, including the University of California and the federal government, and with any person, firm or corporation, for the purpose of engaging in cooperative soil, vegetation, and forest surveys and may make expenditures for such purposes.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1300.)
-------------------------------------------

4673.

The department, with the approval of the Director of General Services, may enter into an agreement with any federal agency for the purpose of investigating the effect of forest cover in the conservation of water and the prevention of erosion on watershed areas.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1300.)
-------------------------------------------

4674.

The department may, with the approval of the Department of General Services, enter into a cooperative agreement, upon the terms and under the conditions as the director deems wise, for either of the following purposes, with any county, city, or district that makes an appropriation for any such purpose:

(a) The protection and forest management of any lands over which the county, city, or district has jurisdiction.

(b) The reforestation or afforestation on lands within the county, city, or district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 133, Sec. 91.   (SB 272)   Effective July 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

4675.

It is in the public interest and to the benefit of the state that watershed lands are rehabilitated to conserve water and soil and to prevent destructive floods.

In furtherance of this policy, the department may conduct surveys and studies, formulate plans, and perform all acts incidental to establishing and maintaining vegetative cover on watershed lands and maintaining watercourse channels free of natural impediments or destructive materials during peak flood flows, including any work necessary to accomplish these purposes.

With the approval of the Director of General Services, the department may enter into contracts with any federal agency or any person, as defined in Section 4101, for any purpose authorized by this section.

The department, or any federal agency or person which has entered into a contract with the department for any purpose authorized by this section, may, in accomplishing the purpose, enter upon, perform required work upon, and inspect any lands.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 350, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

4676.

(a) The director may authorize any work for any purpose authorized by Section 4675 as an exercise of the director’s emergency powers and may request the assistance of any federal agency or person in connection with that work if any of the following conditions exist:

(1) Natural vegetative cover has been denuded to the extent that precipitation may create floods and serious soil depletion and erosion.

(2) The denuded area is of a size, and the topography and soil characteristics of such a nature, that soil loss and floods will have a significant effect upon watershed values and the public health, safety, or welfare.

(3) Vegetative cover will not be restored by natural means in time to effectively prevent undue erosion and flood runoff.

(4) Woody plants and debris within or adjacent to the watercourse channels in or directly downstream from the denuded areas will significantly impede flood runoff or accelerate channel scour. Prior to commencing any work in response to this condition, the director shall advise the Director of Fish and Game of the proposed work.

(b) The expenditure of state funds for emergency work authorized under subdivision (a) shall be limited to lands classified as a state responsibility area pursuant to Article 3 (commencing with Section 4125) of Chapter 1. Any contract for emergency work affecting both a state responsibility area and nonclassified lands shall require that the cost of the work be shared proportionately between the department and the other responsible federal agency or person, as defined in Section 4101.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 350, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. State Nurseries [4681. - 4685.]

4681.

State nurseries shall be maintained under the management of the department for all of the following purposes:

(a) Operation of a state seed bank to provide facilities for the processing and storage of adequate supplies of high-quality seed necessary to protect the genetic integrity and diversity of forest tree and plant species, giving emphasis to those native species threatened with extinction.

(b) Reforestation of public and private lands, giving preference to forest land which has been substantially damaged by fire, flood, insects, disease, or other natural causes.

(c) Production for sale of tree seedlings planted for purposes of meeting resource conservation standards required pursuant to Section 4561 and the rules and regulations of the board. For this purpose, the department shall take whatever steps are necessary to ensure to the maximum degree feasible that the seedlings are adapted to the planting site, and represent an appropriate diversity of forest species.

(d) Propagation and distribution of tree seedlings of the species Taxus brevifolia (Pacific yew) for research related to taxol in the treatment of cancer.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 756, Sec. 10.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

4682.

The department shall construct and maintain such buildings, improvements, and equipment, and shall employ and fix the compensation of such employees as may be necessary to carry out this article.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1300.)
-------------------------------------------

4683.

The department may purchase nursery stock and seed, and may distribute stock or seed for the following purposes:

(a) Public planting or reforestation of public lands, giving emphasis to forest and watershed land which has been substantially damaged by fire, flood, insects, disease, or other natural causes.

(b) Restoration of native tree and plant species threatened with extinction. 

(c) Establishment of experimental plantations of Taxus brevifolia (Pacific yew) for the purpose of research related to taxol in the treatment of cancer.

(d) Soil erosion control, watershed protection, or farm windbreaks.

(e) The production of forest products and farm woodlot products on private lands.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 756, Sec. 11.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

4684.

Trees, plants, nursery stock, and seeds which are sold pursuant to this article shall be sold at prices that are established by the department and approved by the board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1300.)
-------------------------------------------

4684.5.

Notwithstanding Section 4684, the director may give such forest seedlings or native plants for the purposes of reforestation or soil erosion control at the end of each season’s sales as are, in his determination, surplus, to private persons or nonprofit organizations for planting on state, federal, or other public property. Any person or nonprofit organization requesting such surplus forest seedlings or native plants shall provide such information as the director determines is necessary to insure that the forest seedlings or native plants will be planted on public property and that they are sufficiently compatible with the proposed planting area to have a reasonable chance for survival.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1300.)
-------------------------------------------

4685.

The Governor, on behalf of the state, may receive all conveyances or donations of real or personal property necessary to vest in the state the title to any site for a state nursery and to any equipment and supplies that are donated for a state nursery.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1144.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Reforestation Studies and Plans [4691. - 4695.]

4691.

It is hereby declared to be in the interest of the welfare of the people of this state that the need for wood, lumber, poles, piling, wood pulp and other forest products, augmented by the growth of population, requires all forest lands to be kept in a fully productive condition. It is further declared that there are within the state more than two million acres of burned and cutover lands not now contributing adequately to the growth of forest crops nor to the economy of the state. It is further declared to be in the interest of the people of California that the state determine feasible means and methods for reforesting nonproducing forest lands to the end that all forest lands will be eventually brought up to their maximum growth capacity.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1144.)
-------------------------------------------

4692.

The department may make surveys and prepare maps setting forth the areas of nonrestocking forest lands.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1300.)
-------------------------------------------

4693.

The department may undertake experiments and studies, on lands owned by the state or made available by private owners through cooperative agreements pertinent to determining costs and feasible methods of reforestation by planting, seeding, release of natural seedlings from competing brush, or other procedure deemed promising of the desired results, and involving also brush removal and control, soil preparation and control of rodents or other destructive organisms.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1300.)
-------------------------------------------

4694.

Experimentation and studies shall be conducted with the advice and cooperation of the University of California School of Forestry.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 56, Sec. 34.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

4695.

The department may collect the additional seed required, increase the capacity of state nurseries, purchase the necessary equipment and employ the necessary personnel to effectuate the purposes of this article.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1300.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Gifts of Land and Contributions [4701. - 4703.]

4701.

The director, upon the recommendation of the board, may accept on behalf of the state gifts of land suitable for forestry purposes or suitable for the purposes of reforestation or afforestation, and may receive contributions from any source for the purchase, or the care and maintenance, of such land. The recommendation of the board shall be made by resolution duly adopted at a regular meeting.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1144.)
-------------------------------------------

4702.

The acceptance of the land or contributions shall be subject to such conditions or restrictions as the board deems advisable. Any conditions or restrictions required by the board shall be clearly set forth in the resolution of the board which recommends acceptance of the land or contributions and in the instruments of conveyance.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1144.)
-------------------------------------------

4703.

Before accepting conveyance of the land, the director shall have the title examined. The director shall not accept title unless a good and merchantable title free and clear of all taxes, liens, or other financial encumbrances is shown to be vested in the grantor or donor. The title shall be passed upon and approved by the Attorney General.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 133, Sec. 92.   (SB 272)   Effective July 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Forest Insect and Plant Disease Control [4712. - 4718.]

4712.

As used in this article:

(a) “Owner” includes any individual, partnership, corporation, or association.

(b) “Timberland” means any land which has enough timber, standing or down, to constitute, in the judgment of the board, an insect or pine beetle infestation breeding ground or plant disease hazard of a nature to constitute a menace, injurious and dangerous to timber or forest growth.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1144.)
-------------------------------------------

4713.

Pine beetles and other insect pests or plant diseases which are harmful, detrimental and injurious to timber and forest growth are a public nuisance.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1144.)
-------------------------------------------

4714.

Every owner of timber or timberlands shall control or eradicate the insect pests or plant diseases on lands owned by the owner or under the owner’s control. If the owner does not do so the work may be performed as provided in this article.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 133, Sec. 93.   (SB 272)   Effective July 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

4714.5.

The movement of eucalyptus wood containing live Eucalyptus Longhorn Borers or their larvae in trucks or trailers is prohibited. A violation of this section is a misdemeanor punishable by a fine of not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000), or by imprisonment in a county jail for not more than six months, or by both that fine and imprisonment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 225, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

4715.

The department, in accordance with policy established by the board, may enter into agreements with any owner and with any agency of government, including the federal government, for the purpose of controlling or eradicating forest insects or plant diseases damaging or threatening destruction to timber or forest growth, and it may make expenditures for that purpose.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 408, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

4716.

(a) Whenever the director determines that there exists an area that is infested or infected with insect pests or plant diseases injurious to timber or forest growth and that the infestation or infection is of such a character as to be a menace to the timber or timberlands of adjacent owners, the director, with the approval of the board, may declare the existence of a zone of infestation or infection, and describe and fix its boundaries.

(b) If the director declares the existence of a zone of infestation or infection pursuant to subdivision (a), the department or its agents may go upon state and private lands within the zone of infestation or infection and shall cause the infestation or infection to be eradicated or controlled in a manner that is approved by the board.

(c) (1) Within a zone of infestation or infection, the department may remove live vegetation directly adjacent to dead or dying vegetation that is substantially at risk of infestation or infection.

(2) The department may also remove soil that harbors or could reasonably harbor insects or pathogens injurious to timber or forest growth, and that have the potential to facilitate the spread of insects or pathogens to live trees or could substantially increase the risk of subsequent infestations or infections.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 365, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

4717.

The department may make the necessary surveys and appraisals to obtain pertinent data and information on insect infestations and disease infections. The department may make expenditures for that purpose.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1300.)
-------------------------------------------

4718.

If the director determines that insect or disease control work within the designated zone of infestation or infection is no longer necessary or feasible the director shall, with the approval of the board, dissolve the zone.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 133, Sec. 94.   (SB 272)   Effective July 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Preservation of Big Trees [4721. - 4727.]

4721.

It is the policy of the state to preserve as far as possible the species Sequoia gigantea in the interest of conservation, both of soil and of the species itself, and for the benefit of present and future generations.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1144.)
-------------------------------------------

4722.

Upon the finding of the Department of Parks and Recreation or the director, or both, that any Sequoia gigantea grove is suitably situated and is of a size and character which justifies its preservation by and for the public, it is the policy of the state to acquire the grove for preservation and conservation purposes.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1300.)
-------------------------------------------

4723.

Pursuant to Sections 4721 and 4722, the Department of Parks and Recreation, or the department, on favorable recommendation of the board, may acquire any forested lands on which are found growing trees of the species Sequoia gigantea when, in the opinion of the commission or the board, the acquisition of such forested lands is necessary to the preservation of the Sequoia trees and to the public welfare.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1300.)
-------------------------------------------

4725.

Nothing in this article shall be construed as establishing a policy to acquire any such Sequoia gigantea groves for preservation and conservation out of any money appropriated for acquisition of land for park purposes by Chapter 1422, Statutes of 1945.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1144.)
-------------------------------------------

4726.

Any person who willfully cuts down, strips of its bark, or destroys by fire, any tree “over 16 feet in diameter,” in the groves of big trees situated in the Counties of Fresno, Tulare, or Kern, is guilty of a misdemeanor, and is punishable by fine of not less than one hundred dollars ($100) nor more than six hundred dollars ($600), or by imprisonment in the county jail not less than 25 days nor more than 150 days, or by both such fine and imprisonment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1092, Sec. 342.   Effective September 27, 1983.   Operative January 1, 1984, by Sec. 427 of Ch. 1092.)
-------------------------------------------

4727.

Upon the arrest and conviction of any person for violation of Section 4726, the party informing is entitled to one-half of the fines collected.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1144.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. Protection and Development Corporations [4731. - 4738.]

4731.

Corporations may be formed under the general corporation laws of this state for the protection and development of forest and other renewable natural resources, except as the provisions of such laws are modified or extended by the provisions of this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1144.)
-------------------------------------------

4732.

All shares of stock issued by the corporation shall have a par value, and, in addition to other requirements prescribed by law, the articles of incorporation shall set forth all of the following:

(a) That one of the purposes for which the corporation is formed is the protection and development of forest and other renewable natural resources.

(b) The par value of all shares of capital stock of the corporation.

(c) All projects for the protection and development of forests or other renewable natural resources undertaken by the corporation shall, at all times, be subject to the supervision and regulation of the state through the board or other appropriate state authority and subject to the provisions of this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1144.)
-------------------------------------------

4733.

No shareholder of any corporation formed pursuant to this article shall receive or accept from the corporation in repayment of his investment in its shares any sum in excess of the par value of the shares together with current dividends of not to exceed 7 percent per annum of the par value and any cumulative dividends to which the shareholder may be entitled.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1144.)
-------------------------------------------

4734.

Any corporation formed pursuant to this article may, if so authorized by the Commissioner of Financial Protection and Innovation, borrow money from or sell, pledge, or discount its securities to any corporation or agency established under the authority of the federal government.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 452, Sec. 209.   (SB 1498)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

4735.

Any corporation operating in or upon forests or forest lands of this state which borrows money from any corporation or agency established under the authority of the federal government for the purpose of conducting lumber operations shall thereupon automatically become subject to this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1144.)
-------------------------------------------

4736.

No operation of a corporation operating pursuant to this article, involving the cutting of timber or other work upon forest lands shall be commenced without the approval of the board. For the purpose of regulating the conduct of such corporations the board shall establish reasonable regulations regarding adequate fire protection, protection of timber against infestation of forest insects, protection against tree disease epidemics, and provision for natural or artificial reforestation of the areas cut over. The board may make such other reasonable regulations regarding the operation of such corporations as in its opinion is necessary for the proper preservation or protection of the forests and forest lands.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1144.)
-------------------------------------------

4737.

The board shall make regular examination of the properties of such corporations during the operating season at intervals of not more than two months apart. Following such examination a report shall be submitted to the public agency from which loans have been made to the corporation. The cost of such examination shall be charged to and paid by the corporation whose property is examined. If in the opinion of the board the plan of forest management is not being adhered to, the board shall notify the lumber operators and the lender of this fact.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1144.)
-------------------------------------------

4738.
